inc/eng-verb-phrase-inflector.xfscript
! "Inflections" of English definitions for Cree verbs

define Consonant [ b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | z ]  ;

define Vowel [ a | e | i | o | u | â | ê | î | ô | á | é | í | ó | ú | à | è | ì | ò | ù ] ;

define Capital [ A | B | C | D | E | F | G | H | I | J | K | L | M | N | O | P | Q | R | S | T | U | V | W | X | Y | Z ] ;

define Alphabet [ Vowel | Consonant | "y" | Capital ] ;

define Punctuation [ "." | "," | ":" | ";" | "!" | "?" | "-" | "/" | "|" | "\" | %' | %" | "(" | ")" | "[" | "]" | "{" | "}" ] ;

define Symbols [ "@" | "#" | "$" | "€" | "£" | "§" | "%" | "&" | "+" | "*" | "<" | ">" | "+" | "=" | "~" | "^" ] ;

define Number [ 0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ] ;

define Letters [ Alphabet | Punctuation | Symbols | Number | " " ] ;

! define Bx [ " " | .#. | Punctuation ] ;

! define Px [ "," | ";" | .#. ] ;

define Clause [ "Cnj+" | "Rel+" ] ;

define TenseAspect [ "Prs+" | "Prt+" | "Def+" | "Fut+" | "Int+" | "Cond+" | "Inf+" | "Imm+" | "Del+" ] ;

define Progressive [ "Prog+" ] ;

define Repetitive [ "Rept+" ] ;

define Negation [ "Neg+" ] ;

define Subject [ "1Sg+" | "2Sg+" | "3Sg+" | "1Du+" | "2Du+" | "3Du+" | "1Distr+" | "2Distr+" | "3Distr+" | "1Pl+" | "21Pl+" | "2Pl+" | "3Pl+" | "4Sg+" | "4Pl+" | "4Sg/Pl+" | "5Sg/Pl+" | "X+" | "XPl+" ] ;

define DirectObject [ "1SgO+" | "2SgO+" | "3SgO+" | "1DuO+" | "2DuO+" | "3DuO+" | "1DistrO+" | "2DistrO+" | "3DistrO+" | "1PlO+" | "21PlO+" | "2PlO+" | "3PlO+" | "4Sg/PlO+" | "5Sg/PlO+" | "XO+" | "XPlO+" ] ;

define IndirectObject [ "1SgIO+" | "2SgIO+" | "3SgIO+" | "1DuIO+" | "2DuIO+" | "3DuIO+" | "1PlIO+" | "21PlIO+" | "2PlIO+" | "3PlIO+" | "4Sg/PlIO+" | "5Sg/PlIO+" | "XIO+" | "XPlIO+" ] ;

! Variables for tenses/aspects/moods

define RsubjectPrs3Sg [ "@R.subject.3Sg@" | "@R.subject.4Sg@" | "@R.subject.0Sg@" | "@R.subject.1Distr@" | "@R.subject.2Distr@" | "@R.subject.3Distr@" | "@R.subject.X@" ] ;

define DsubjectPrs3Sg [ "@D.subject.3Sg@" "@D.subject.4Sg@" "@D.subject.0Sg@" "@D.subject.1Distr@" "@D.subject.2Distr@" "@D.subject.3Distr@" "@D.subject.X@" ] ;

define Rsubject2SgPl [ "@R.subject.2Sg@" | "@R.subject.2Du@" | "@R.subject.2Pl@" ] ;

define Dsubject2SgPl [ "@D.subject.2Sg@" "@D.subject.2Du@" "@D.subject.2Pl@" ] ;

define RsubjectDuPl [ "@R.subject.1Du@" | "@R.subject.2Du@" | "@R.subject.3Du@" | "@R.subject.1Pl@" | "@R.subject.21Pl@" | "@R.subject.2Pl@" | "@R.subject.3Pl@" | "@R.subject.4Pl@" | "@R.subject.4Sg/Pl@" | "@R.subject.5Sg/Pl@" | "@R.subject.XPl@" ] ;

define DsubjectDuPl [ "@D.subject.1Du@" "@D.subject.2Du@" "@D.subject.3Du@" "@D.subject.1Pl@" "@D.subject.21Pl@" "@D.subject.2Pl@" "@D.subject.3Pl@" "@D.subject.4Pl@" "@D.subject.4Sg/Pl@" "@D.subject.5Sg/Pl@" "@D.subject.XPl@" ] ;

define Px [ "." | "," | ":" | ";" | "!" | "?" | .#. ] ;

define Bx [ Px | " " ] ;

! (Word-boundary character set - non-printable characters and space)
define Wx [ \[ Letters ] | " " ] ; 

! Marking non-subject occurrences of 'it'
regex [ {it} -> IT || " " _ [ "." | "," | .#. ] ,, {it} -> IT || Alphabet " " _ ,, {it} -> IT || "(" _ ,, {it} -> IT || _ ")" ] ;
define itNonSubjectMarking

regex [ {is} -> ISZ || [ Wx | Bx ] [ {s/he} | {he} | {she} | {it} ] { } _ [ Wx | Bx ] ]
.o. [ [ {s/he} | {he} | {she} | {they} | {it} ] -> SUBJ
, [ {him/herself} | {himself} | {herself} | {themselves} | {themself} ] -> RFLX
, {s.o.'s} -> POSS
, [ {s.o.} | {him} | {them} ] -> DOBJ
, {s.t.} -> DOBJinanim
, {to s.b.} -> {to } IOBJ
, {for s.b.} -> {for } IOBJ
, {there is} -> {there } ISZ
|| [ Wx | Bx ] _ [ Wx | Bx ] ] ;
define Standardization

regex [ s -> {>s} "@D.neg@" "@D.prog.Prog@" [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" ] RsubjectPrs3Sg
, s -> {>ed} "@D.neg@" "@D.prog.Prog@" "@R.tense.Prt@"
, s -> {>ing} "@R.prog.Prog@"
, s -> {>} [ [ [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" ] DsubjectPrs3Sg "@D.neg@" "@D.prog.Prog@" ]
| [ [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" | "@R.tense.Prt@" ] "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog.Prog@" ]
| [ [ "@R.tense.Fut@" | "@R.tense.Def@" | "@R.tense.Int@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" | "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" ] "@D.prog.Prog@" ] ]
|| SUBJ Wx+ Alphabet+ _ [ Wx | Bx ] ] ;
! ] ;
define VerbInflection

regex [ {ha>} -> {have}
, {ha>ed}-> {had}
, {ha>ing} -> {hav>ing}
, {doe>} -> {do}
, {doe>ed} -> {did}
, {doe>ing} -> {do>ing}
|| Wx _ Wx ] ;
define IrregularVerbs

! Be-copula inflection
regex [ IS | ISZ -> {be} [ "@R.tense.Def@" | "@R.tense.Int@" | "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]
, IS | ISZ -> {am} "@R.subject.1Sg@" [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" | "@R.tense.Fut@" ]
, IS | ISZ -> {are} [ "@R.subject.2Sg@" | RsubjectDuPl ] [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Fut@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" ]
, IS | ISZ -> {is} RsubjectPrs3Sg [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Fut@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" ]
, IS | ISZ -> {was} [ "@D.subject.2Sg@" DsubjectDuPl ] "@R.tense.Prt@"
, IS | ISZ -> {were} [ "@R.subject.2Sg@" | RsubjectDuPl ] "@R.tense.Prt@"
|| Wx _ Wx ] ;
define BeInflection

regex [ [..] -> { who} "@R.clause.Rel@"
| "@D.clause.Rel@"
|| SUBJ _ ] ;
define Relativization

regex [
! Present tense / (Future) conditional
[..] -> [ [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" ] "@D.neg@" "@D.prog@"
| { does not} [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" ] "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@" RsubjectPrs3Sg
| { do not} [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" ] "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@" DsubjectPrs3Sg
| { } IS [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" ] "@D.neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
| { } IS { not} [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" ] "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
! Past tense
| "@R.tense.Prt@" "@D.neg@" "@D.prog@"
| { did not} "@R.tense.Prt@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@"
| { } IS "@R.tense.Prt@" "@D.neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
| { } IS { not} "@R.tense.Prt@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
! Future prospective
| { } IS { going to} "@R.tense.Fut@" "@D.neg@" "@D.prog@"
| { } IS { not going to} "@R.tense.Fut@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@"
| { } IS { going to be} "@R.tense.Fut@" "@D.neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
| { } IS { not going to be} "@R.tense.Fut@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
! Future definite
| { will} "@R.tense.Def@" "@D.neg@" "@D.prog@"
| { will not} "@R.tense.Def@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@"
| { will be} "@R.tense.Def@" "@D.neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
| { will not be} "@R.tense.Def@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
! Future intentional
| { wants to} "@R.tense.Int@" "@D.neg@" "@D.prog@" RsubjectPrs3Sg
| { want to} "@R.tense.Int@" "@D.neg@" "@D.prog@" DsubjectPrs3Sg
| { does not want to} "@R.tense.Int@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@" RsubjectPrs3Sg
| { do not want to} "@R.tense.Int@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@" DsubjectPrs3Sg
| { wants to be} "@R.tense.Int@" "@D.neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@" RsubjectPrs3Sg
| { want to be} "@R.tense.Int@" "@D.neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@" DsubjectPrs3Sg
| { does not want to be} "@R.tense.Int@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@" RsubjectPrs3Sg
| { do not want to be} "@R.tense.Int@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@" DsubjectPrs3Sg
! Infinitive
| { to} "@R.tense.Inf@" "@D.neg@" "@D.prog@"
| { to not} "@R.tense.Inf@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@"
| { to be} "@R.tense.Inf@" "@D.neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
| { to not be} "@R.tense.Inf@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
! Immediate imperative
| "@R.tense.Imm@" "@D.neg@" "@D.prog@"
| "@R.tense.Imm@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@" Dsubject2SgPl
| { do not} "@R.tense.Imm@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@" Rsubject2SgPl
| { be} "@R.tense.Imm@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@" Dsubject2SgPl
| { be} "@R.tense.Imm@" "@D.neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
| { do not be} "@R.tense.Imm@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@" Rsubject2SgPl
! Delayed imperative
| "@R.tense.Del@" "@D.neg@" "@D.prog@"
| "@R.tense.Del@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@" Dsubject2SgPl
| { do not} "@R.tense.Del@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@" Rsubject2SgPl
| { be} "@R.tense.Del@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@" Dsubject2SgPl
| { be} "@R.tense.Del@" "@D.neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
| { do not be} "@R.tense.Del@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@" Rsubject2SgPl ]
|| Wx SUBJ _ " " \ISZ
] ;
define AuxiliaryPhrase

regex [
! Present tense / (Future) conditional
ISZ -> [ IS [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" ] "@D.neg@" "@D.prog@"
| IS { not} [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" ] "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@" ! RsubjectPrs3Sg
! | IS { not} [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" ] "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@" DsubjectPrs3Sg ! Duplicate?
| IS { being} [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" ] "@D.neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
| IS { not being} [ "@R.tense.Prs@" | "@R.tense.Cond@" ] "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
! Past tense
| IS "@R.tense.Prt@" "@D.neg@" "@D.prog@"
| IS { not} "@R.tense.Prt@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@"
| IS { being} "@R.tense.Prt@" "@D.neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
| IS { not being} "@R.tense.Prt@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
! Future prospective
| IS { going to be} "@R.tense.Fut@" "@D.neg@" "@D.prog@"
| IS { not going to be} "@R.tense.Fut@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@"
| IS { going to be being} "@R.tense.Fut@" "@D.neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
| IS { not going to be being} "@R.tense.Fut@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
! Future definite
| {will be} "@R.tense.Def@" "@D.neg@" "@D.prog@"
| {will not be} "@R.tense.Def@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@"
| {will be being} "@R.tense.Def@" "@D.neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
| {will not be being} "@R.tense.Def@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
! Future intentional
| {wants to be} "@R.tense.Int@" "@D.neg@" "@D.prog@" RsubjectPrs3Sg
| {want to be} "@R.tense.Int@" "@D.neg@" "@D.prog@" DsubjectPrs3Sg
| {does not want to be} "@R.tense.Int@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@" RsubjectPrs3Sg
| {do not want to be} "@R.tense.Int@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@" DsubjectPrs3Sg
| {wants to be being} "@R.tense.Int@" "@D.neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@" RsubjectPrs3Sg
| {want to be being} "@R.tense.Int@" "@D.neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@" DsubjectPrs3Sg
| {does not want to be being} "@R.tense.Int@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@" RsubjectPrs3Sg
| {do not want to be being} "@R.tense.Int@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@" DsubjectPrs3Sg
! Infinitive
| {to be} "@R.tense.Inf@" "@D.neg@" "@D.prog@"
| {to not be} "@R.tense.Inf@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@"
| {to be being} "@R.tense.Inf@" "@D.neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
| {to not be being} "@R.tense.Inf@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@"
! Immediate imperative
| {be} "@R.tense.Imm@" "@D.neg@" "@D.prog@"
| {be} "@R.tense.Imm@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@" Dsubject2SgPl
| {do not be} "@R.tense.Imm@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@" Rsubject2SgPl
| {be being} "@R.tense.Imm@" "@R.prog.Prog@" Dsubject2SgPl
| {be being} "@R.tense.Imm@" "@D.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@" Rsubject2SgPl
| {do not be being} "@R.tense.Imm@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@" Rsubject2SgPl
! Delayed imperative
| {be} "@R.tense.Del@" "@D.neg@" "@D.prog@"
| {be} "@R.tense.Del@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@" Dsubject2SgPl
| {do not be} "@R.tense.Del@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@D.prog@" Rsubject2SgPl
| {be being} "@R.tense.Del@" "@R.prog.Prog@" Dsubject2SgPl
| {be being} "@R.tense.Del@" "@D.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@" Rsubject2SgPl
| {do not be being} "@R.tense.Del@" "@R.neg.Neg@" "@R.prog.Prog@" Rsubject2SgPl ]
|| [ {there } | SUBJ { } ] _
] ;
define BeAuxiliaryPhrase

regex [
[..] -> "@R.clause.Cnj@" "@D.tense.Inf@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" {as }
| "@R.tense.Cond@" "@D.clause@" {when }
| "@R.tense.Inf@" "@D.clause@" {for }
| [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" ] Dsubject2SgPl "@D.neg@" {let }
| [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" ] Dsubject2SgPl "@R.neg@" {do not let }
| "@D.clause.Cnj@" "@D.tense.Cond@" "@D.tense.Inf@" [ [ "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" ] | [ [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" ] Rsubject2SgPl ] ]
|| _ [ SUBJ | {there } [ IS | {be} | {will} | {to} ] ] ! context needs checking for redundancy
] ;
define PhrasePrefix

regex [
[..] -> { now} "@R.tense.Imm@"
| { later} "@R.tense.Del@"
| "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@"
|| _ Px ]
.o. [ [..] -> { again and again} "@R.rept.Rept@" | "@D.rept.Rept@"
|| _ Px ] ;
define PhraseSuffix
